California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(D) The prepaid health plan hospital managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate shall be eighty-one dollars and twenty cents ($81.20) for the two remaining subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, eighty-one dollars and twenty cents ($81.20) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, ninety-five dollars and twenty cents ($95.20) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2015–16 subject fiscal
 year, and ninety-five dollars and twenty cents ($95.20) for the first two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.

(E) The prepaid health plan hospital Medi-Cal managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate shall be two hundred fifty-five dollars and ninety-seven cents ($255.97) for the two remaining subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, two hundred seventy-eight dollars and thirty-seven cents ($278.37) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, three hundred eighteen dollars and sixteen cents ($318.16) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and three hundred forty-six dollars and sixteen cents ($346.16) for the first two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.

(F) Upon federal approval or conditional federal approval described in Section 14169.63, the director
 shall have the discretion to revise the fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate, the managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate, the Medi-Cal per diem quality assurance fee rate, the prepaid health plan hospital managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate, or the prepaid health plan hospital Medi-Cal managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate, based on the funds required to make the payments specified in this article, in consultation with the hospital community.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision in this article, the following shall apply to the second program period under this article:

(1) The second program period under this article shall begin on January 1, 2017, and shall end on June 30, 2019.

(2) The retrieval date shall occur between October 1, 2016, and December 31, 2016.

(3) The base calendar year shall be the 2013 calendar year, or a more recent calendar year for which the department determines reliable data is available.

(4) The rebase calculation year shall be the 2015–16 state fiscal year.

(5) With respect to a hospital described in subdivision (f) of Section 14165.50, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The hospital shall not be considered a new hospital as defined in subdivision (ai) of Section 14169.51 for the purposes of this article.

(B) To the extent permitted by federal law or other federal requirements, the department shall use the best available and reasonable current estimates or projections made with respect to the hospital for an annual
 period as to the data, including, but not limited to, the days data source and data described as being derived from a state paid claims file, used for all purposes, including, but not limited to, the calculation of supplemental payments and the quality assurance fee. The estimates and projections shall be deemed to reflect paid claims and shall be used for each data element regardless of the time period otherwise applicable to the data element. The data elements include, but are not limited to, acute psychiatric days, annual fee-for-service days, annual managed care days, annual Medi-Cal days, fee-for-service days, general acute care days, high acuity days, managed care days, Medi-Cal days, Medi-Cal fee-for-service days, Medi-Cal managed care days, Medi-Cal managed care fee days, outpatient base amount, and transplant days.

(h) Commencing January 2016, the department shall provide a clear narrative description along with fiscal detail in the
 Medi-Cal estimate package, submitted to the Legislature in January and May of each year, of all of the calculations made by the department pursuant to this section for the second program period and every program period thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 32.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.  This section was added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657 (SB 239).)
-------------------------------------------

14169.60.

(a) The amount of any payments made under this article to private hospitals, including the amount of payments made under Sections 14169.54 and 14169.55 and additional payments to private hospitals by managed health care plans pursuant to Section 14169.57, shall not be included in the calculation of the low-income percent or the OBRA 1993 payment limitation, as defined in paragraph (24) of subdivision (a) of
 Section 14105.98, for purposes of determining payments to private hospitals.

(b) The supplemental payments and other payments under this article shall be regarded as quality assurance payments, the implementation or suspension of which does not affect a determination of the adequacy of any rates under federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.61.

(a) (1) Except as provided in this section, all data and other information relating to a hospital that are used for the purposes of this article, including, without limitation, the days data source, shall continue to be used to determine the payments to that hospital, regardless of whether the hospital has undergone one or more
 changes of ownership.

(2) All supplemental payments to a hospital under this article shall be made to the licensee of a hospital on the date the supplemental payment is made. All quality assurance fee payments under this article shall be paid by the licensee of a hospital on the date the quarterly quality assurance fee payment is due.

(b) The data of separate facilities prior to a consolidation shall be aggregated for the purposes of this article if: (1) a private hospital consolidates with another private hospital, (2) the facilities operate under a consolidated hospital license, (3) data for a period prior to the consolidation is used for purposes of this article, and (4) neither hospital has had a change of ownership on or after the effective date of this article unless paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) has been satisfied by the new owner. Data of a facility that was a
 separately licensed hospital prior to the consolidation shall not be included in the data, including the days data source, for the purpose of determining payments to the facility or the quality assurance fees due from the facility under the article for any time period during which the facility is closed. A facility shall be deemed to be closed for purposes of this subdivision on the first day of any period during which the facility has no general acute, psychiatric, or rehabilitation inpatients for at least 30 consecutive days. A facility that has been deemed to be closed under this subdivision shall no longer be deemed to be closed on the first subsequent day on which it has general acute, psychiatric, or rehabilitation inpatients.

(c) The payments to a hospital under this article shall not be made, and the quality assurance fees shall not be due, for any period during which the hospital is closed. A hospital shall be deemed to be closed on
 the first day of any period during which the hospital has no general acute, psychiatric, or rehabilitation inpatients for at least 30 consecutive days. A hospital that has been deemed to be closed under this subdivision shall no longer be deemed to be closed on the first subsequent day on which it has general acute, psychiatric, or rehabilitation inpatients. Payments under this article to a hospital and installment payments of the aggregate quality assurance fee due from a hospital that is closed during any portion of a subject fiscal quarter shall be reduced by applying a fraction, expressed as a percentage, the numerator of which shall be the number of days during the applicable subject fiscal quarter that the hospital is closed during the subject fiscal year and the denominator of which shall be the number of days in the subject fiscal quarter.

(d) The following provisions shall apply only for purposes of this article, and shall have no
 application outside of this article nor shall they affect the assumption of any outstanding monetary obligation to the Medi-Cal program:

(1) The director shall develop and describe in provider bulletins and on the department’s Internet Web site a process by which the new operator of a hospital that has a days data source in whole or in part from a previous operator may enter into an agreement with the department to confirm that it is financially responsible or to become financially responsible to the department for the outstanding monetary obligation to the Medi-Cal program of the previous operator in order to avoid being classified as a new hospital for purposes of this article. This process shall be available for changes of ownership that occur before, on, or after January 1, 2014, but only in regard to payments under this article and otherwise shall have no retroactive effect.

(2) The outstanding monetary obligation referred to in subdivision (ai) of Section 14169.51 shall include responsibility for all of the following:

(A) Payment of the quality assurance fee established pursuant to this article.

(B) Known overpayments that have been asserted by the department or its fiscal intermediary by sending a written communication that is received by the hospital prior to the date that the new operator becomes the licensee of the hospital.

(C) Overpayments that are asserted after such date and arise from customary reconciliations of payments, such as cost report settlements, and, with the exception of overpayments described in subparagraph (B), shall exclude liabilities arising from the fraudulent or intentionally criminal act of a prior operator if the new operator did not knowingly
 participate in or continue the fraudulent or criminal act after becoming the licensee.

(3) The department shall have the discretion to determine whether the new owner properly and fully agreed to be financially responsible for the outstanding monetary obligation in connection with the Medi-Cal program and seek additional assurances as the department deems necessary, except that a new owner that executes an agreement with the department to be financially responsible for the monetary obligations as described in paragraph (1) shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed to be financially responsible for the outstanding monetary obligation in connection with the Medi-Cal program. The department shall have the discretion to establish the terms for satisfying the outstanding monetary obligation in connection with the Medi-Cal program, including, but not limited to, recoupment from amounts payable to the hospital under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 33.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.  This section was added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657 (SB 239).)
-------------------------------------------

14169.62.

Notwithstanding any provision in this article, the director may correct any identified material and egregious errors in the data, including, but not limited to, the days data source, used for the following: acute psychiatric days, annual fee-for-service days, annual managed care days, annual Medi-Cal days, fee-for-service days, general acute care days, high acuity days, managed care days, Medi-Cal days, Medi-Cal fee-for-service days,
 Medi-Cal managed care days, Medi-Cal managed care fee days, outpatient base amount, and transplant days. An error is material and egregious if the error is clear to the director based on information the director finds to be reliable and results in an increase or decrease to a hospital’s supplemental payment amounts under this article, or in a hospital’s quality assurance fee payments, of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) for any subject fiscal year. The director’s determination whether to exercise his or her discretion under this section and any determination made by the director under this section shall not be subject to judicial review, except that a hospital may bring a writ of mandate under Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure to rectify an abuse of discretion by the department in correcting that hospital’s data when that correction results in greater fees for that hospital pursuant to Sections 14169.52 and 14169.53 or lower supplemental payments for that hospital pursuant to Section
 14169.54 and 14169.55.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.63.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article requiring federal approvals, the department may impose and collect the quality assurance fee and may make payments under this article, including increased capitation payments, based upon receiving a letter from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the United States
 Department of Health and Human Services that indicates likely federal approval, but only if and to the extent that the letter is sufficient as set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) In order for the letter to be sufficient under this section, the director shall find that the letter meets both of the following requirements:

(1) The letter is in writing and signed by an official of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or an official of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(2) The director, after consultation with the hospital community, has determined, in the exercise of his or her sole discretion, that the letter provides a sufficient level of assurance to justify advanced implementation of the fee and payment provisions.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed as modifying the requirement under Section 14169.69 that payments shall be made only to the extent a sufficient amount of funds collected as the quality assurance fee are available to cover the nonfederal share of those payments.

(d) Upon notice from the federal government that final federal approval for the fee model under this article or for the supplemental payments to private hospitals under Section 14169.54 or 14169.55 has been denied, any fees collected pursuant to this section shall be refunded and any payments made pursuant to this article shall be recouped, including, but not limited to, supplemental payments and grants, increased capitation payments, payments to hospitals by health care plans resulting from the increased capitation payments, and payments for the health care coverage of children. To the extent fees were paid by a hospital that also received payments under this
 section, the payments may first be recouped from fees that would otherwise be refunded to the hospital prior to the use of any other recoupment method allowed under law.

(e) Any payment made pursuant to this section shall be a conditional payment until final federal approval has been received.

(f) The director shall have broad authority under this section to collect the quality assurance fee for an interim period after receipt of the letter described in subdivision (a) pending receipt of all necessary federal approvals. This authority shall include discretion to determine both of the following:

(1) Whether the quality assurance fee should be collected on a full or pro rata basis during the interim period.

(2) The dates on which payments of the quality
 assurance fee are due.

(g) The department may draw against the fund for all administrative costs associated with implementation under this article, consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 14169.53.

(h) This section shall be implemented only to the extent federal financial participation is not jeopardized by implementation prior to the receipt of all necessary final federal approvals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 34.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.  This section was added by stats. 2013, Ch. 657 (SB 239).)
-------------------------------------------

14169.64.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this article, the director may modify any timeline or timelines related to the assessment of the quality assurance fee or Medi-Cal payments under this article, including capitation payments, if the director, upon consultation with the hospital community, determines that it is impossible from an operational perspective to implement a timeline or timelines without the
 modification.

(b) The department shall notify the Joint Budget Legislative Committee and the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature five working days prior to implementing a modified timeline or timelines under subdivision (a).

(c) The department shall consult with representatives of the hospital community in developing a modified timeline or timelines pursuant to this section.

(d) The discretion to modify timelines under this section shall include, but not be limited to, discretion to accelerate payments to plans or hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.65.

(a) Upon receipt of a letter that indicates likely federal approval that the director determines is sufficient for implementation under Section 14169.63, or upon the receipt of federal approval, the following shall occur:

(1) To the maximum extent possible, and consistent with the
 availability of funds in the fund, the department shall make all of the payments under Sections 14169.54, 14169.55, and 14169.56, including, but not limited to, supplemental payments and increased capitation payments, prior to the end of a program period, except that the increased capitation payments under Section 14169.56 shall not be made until federal approval is obtained for these payments.

(2) The department shall make supplemental payments to hospitals under this article consistent with the timeframe described in Section 14169.66 or a modified timeline developed pursuant to Section 14169.64.

(b) If any payment or payments made pursuant to this section are found to be inconsistent with federal law, the department shall recoup the payments by means of withholding or any other available remedy.

(c) This section
 shall not affect the department’s ongoing authority to continue, after the end of a program period, to collect quality assurance fees imposed on or before the end of the program period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 35.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.  This section was added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657 (SB 239).)
-------------------------------------------

14169.66.

The department shall make disbursements from the fund consistent with the following:

(a) Fund disbursements shall be made periodically within 15 days of each date on which quality assurance fees are due from hospitals.

(b) The funds shall be
 disbursed in accordance with the order of priority set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14169.53, except that funds may be set aside for increased capitation payments to managed care health plans pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14169.56.

(c) The funds shall be disbursed in each payment cycle in accordance with the order of priority set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14169.53 as modified by subdivision (b), and so that the supplemental payments and direct grants to hospitals and the increased capitation payments to managed health care plans are made to the maximum extent for which funds are available.

(d) To the maximum extent possible, consistent with the availability of funds in the fund and the timing of federal approvals, the supplemental payments and direct grants to hospitals and increased capitation payments to managed health care plans under this article
 shall be made before the last day of a program period.

(e) The aggregate amount of funds to be disbursed to private hospitals shall be determined under Sections 14169.54 and 14169.55. The aggregate amount of funds to be disbursed to managed health care plans shall be determined under Section 14169.56. The aggregate amount of direct grants to designated and nondesignated public hospitals shall be determined under Section 14169.58.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 36.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.  This section was added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657 (SB 239).)
-------------------------------------------

14169.67.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, supplemental payments or other payments under this article shall only be required and payable in any quarter for which a fee payment obligation exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.68.

(a) In order to ensure that the proceeds of the quality assurance fee, the matching amount provided by the federal government, and any interest earned on those proceeds are used to supplement existing funding for hospital services provided to Medi-Cal patients and not supplant such funding, the aggregate fee-for-service payments under the Medi-Cal program to hospitals for hospital services furnished on and after
 January 1, 2014, for each fiscal year or portion thereof that is in a program period shall not be less than the aggregate amounts that would have been paid for those services under the rates and payment methodologies in effect on December 31, 2013. This provision shall be applied separately for each category of hospital services.

(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Aggregate amounts” means payments that would have been made on a fee-for-service basis to a hospital under Medi-Cal where the nonfederal share of the payments would have been appropriated from state general funds with the exception of disproportionate share replacement payments made under Section 14166.11. Aggregate amounts do not include payments made pursuant to Article 5.228 (commencing with Section 14169.1).

(2) “Aggregate fee-for-service payments” means all payments made on a fee-for-service basis to a hospital under Medi-Cal where the nonfederal share of the payments were appropriated from state general funds with the exception of disproportionate share replacement payments made under Section 14166.11. Aggregate fee-for-service payments do not include payments made under this article.

(3) “Hospital services” means all services covered under Medi-Cal furnished by a hospital, including, but not limited to, hospital inpatient services, hospital outpatient services, skilled nursing facility services furnished by a hospital, and subacute services furnished by a hospital.

(c) Disproportionate share replacement payments to private hospitals shall be not less than the amount determined pursuant to Section 14166.11. For purposes of this subdivision, references to Section
 14166.11 are to the version of Section 14166.11 in effect on the effective date of this article.

(d) This section shall be implemented only to the extent it does not violate federal law and only to the extent available federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(e) This section shall not require a rate or level of funding to be maintained where federal financial participation for the rate or level of funding has been reduced or eliminated by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.69.

(a) The director shall do all of the following:

(1) Promptly submit any state plan amendment or waiver request that may be necessary to implement this article.

(2) Promptly seek federal approvals or waivers as may be necessary to implement this article and to obtain federal financial
 participation to the maximum extent possible for the payments under this article.

(3) Amend the contracts between the managed health care plans and the department as necessary to incorporate the provisions of Sections 14169.56 and 14169.57 and promptly seek all necessary federal approvals of those amendments. The department shall pursue amendments to the contracts as soon as possible after the effective date of this article, and shall not wait for federal approval of this article prior to pursuing amendments to the contracts. The amendments to the contracts shall, among other provisions, set forth an agreement to increase capitation payments to managed health care plans under Section 14169.56 and increase payments to hospitals under Section 14169.57 in a manner that relates back to the beginning of a program period, or as soon thereafter as possible, conditioned on obtaining all federal approvals necessary for federal financial participation
 for the increased capitation payments to the managed health care plans.

(b) In implementing this article, the department may utilize the services of the Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary through a change order to the fiscal intermediary contract to administer this program, consistent with the requirements of Sections 14104.6, 14104.7, 14104.8, and 14104.9. Contracts entered into for purposes of implementing this article shall not be subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(c) In the event any hospital, or any party on behalf of a hospital, initiates a case or proceeding in any state or federal court in which the hospital seeks any relief of any sort whatsoever, including, but not limited to, monetary relief, injunctive relief, declaratory relief, or a writ, based in whole or in part on a contention that any or all of this article is
 unlawful and may not be lawfully implemented, both of the following shall apply:

(1) Payments shall not be made to the hospital pursuant to this article until the case or proceeding is finally resolved, including the final disposition of all appeals.

(2) Any amount computed to be payable to the hospital pursuant to this article for a subject fiscal year shall be withheld by the department and shall be paid to the hospital only after the case or proceeding is finally resolved, including the final disposition of all appeals.

(d) Subject to Section 14169.63, no payment shall be made under this article until all necessary federal approvals for the payment and for the fee provisions in this article have been obtained and the fee has been imposed and collected. Notwithstanding any other law, payments under this article
 shall be made only to the extent that the fee established in this article is collected and available to cover the nonfederal share of the payments.

(e) All payments made by the department to hospitals and managed health care plans under this article shall be made only from the following:

(1) The quality assurance fee set forth in this article, along with any interest or other investment income thereon.

(2) Federal reimbursement and any other related federal funds. 

(f) In order to ensure access to care to hospital services, the director shall seek federal approval for supplemental payments for hospital services provided to all Medi-Cal populations, including the optional and expansion populations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.70.

Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this article by means of provider bulletins, all plan letters, or other similar instruction, without taking regulatory action. The department shall also provide notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature
 within five working days when the above-described action is taken in order to inform the Legislature that the action is being implemented.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.71.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the director may proportionately reduce the amount of any supplemental payments or increased capitation payments under this article to the extent that the payment would result in the reduction of other amounts payable to a hospital or managed health care plan due to the application of federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.72.

This article shall become inoperative if any of the following occurs:

(a) The effective date of a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction or a final determination by the United States Department of Health and Human Services or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that the quality assurance fee established pursuant to this article, or Section 14169.54 or 14169.55, cannot be implemented. This subdivision shall not apply to any final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction in a case brought by hospitals located outside the state.

(b) The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services denies approval for, or does not approve on or before the
 last day of a program period, the implementation of Sections 14169.52, 14169.53, 14169.54, and 14169.55, and the department fails to modify Section 14169.52, 14169.53, 14169.54, or 14169.55 pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14169.53 in order to meet the requirements of federal law or to obtain federal approval.

(c) The Legislature fails to appropriate moneys in the fund in the annual Budget Act, or fails to appropriate such moneys in a separate bill enacted within thirty (30) days following enactment of the annual Budget Act.

(d) The department has sought but has not received federal financial participation for the supplemental payments and other costs required by this article for which federal financial participation has been sought.

(e) A lawsuit related to this article is filed against the state and a
 preliminary injunction or other order has been issued that results in a financial disadvantage to the state. For purposes of this subdivision, “financial disadvantage to the state” means either of the following:

(1) A loss of federal financial participation.

(2) A net General Fund cost incurred due to the act.

(f) The proceeds of the fee and any interest and dividends earned on deposits are not deposited into the fund or are not used as provided in Section 14169.53.

(g) The proceeds of the fee, the matching amount provided by the federal government, and interest and dividends earned on deposits in the fund are not used as provided in Section 14169.68.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52, Sec. 4.1.   Article 5.230, commencing with Section 14169.50, is conditionally inoperative as prescribed in this section.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.73.

In the event this article becomes inoperative pursuant to Section 14169.72, all of the following shall apply:

(a) No hospital shall be required to pay the fee except for any fee owed prior to the article becoming inoperative.

(b) The director shall execute a declaration stating that he or she has
 determined that the article is inoperative and shall state the basis for this determination. The director shall retain the declaration and provide a copy, within five working days of the execution of the declaration, to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. In addition, the director shall post the declaration on the department’s Internet Web site and the director shall send the declaration to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel.

(c) Upon execution of the declaration described in subdivision (b), the director shall implement a plan, in consultation with the hospital community and the Legislature, to wind down the program consistent with the purposes of the article, including the recoupment of payments made under this article if ordered by a court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed by Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.74.

Beginning with the proposed budget for the 2014–15 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of Finance shall report in the Governor’s proposed budget and the May Revision the difference in General Fund benefit for the upcoming fiscal year resulting from this article and what was anticipated at the time the Budget Act of 2013 was enacted. It is the intent of the Legislature that additional General Fund benefit be
 appropriated to supplement, and not supplant, funding for health and human service programs, which may include the cost of medical interpreters.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed by Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.75.

Notwithstanding subdivision (k) of Section 14167.35, subdivisions (a), (i), and (j) of Section 14167.35, creating the fund, are not repealed and shall remain operative as long as this article remains operative.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52, Sec. 4.2.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.76.

This article is repealed on January 1 of the year following the date on which the article becomes inoperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Repealed, by its own provisions, on January 1 after inoperative date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Note: Repeal affects Article 5.230, commencing with Section 14169.50.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.231. Medi-Cal Hospital Reimbursement Improvement and Restoration Act of 2013 [14169.81. - 14169.83.]

14169.81.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 14105.191 and 14105.192, reimbursement for services provided by skilled nursing facilities that are distinct parts of general acute care hospitals shall be determined, for dates of service on or after October 1, 2013, without application of the reductions and limitations set forth in Sections 14105.191 and 14105.192.

(b) For dates of service on or after January 1, 2024, the department shall adopt a rate year based on the calendar year for skilled nursing facilities that are distinct parts of general acute care hospitals, including subacute care units.

(c) In implementing this section,
 the department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of provider bulletins or notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 155.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.82.
